Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.660

Unqualified persons voting.

Any person who knows that he or she does not possess the legal qualifications of a voter and who votes at any primary or special or general election authorized by law to be held in this state for any office whatever is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2003 c 111 s 2133; 1991 c 81 s 17; 1965 c 9 s 29.85.240. Prior: 1911 c 89 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 905; 1873 p 204 s 104; 1865 p 51 s 4; 1854 p 93 s 95; RRS s 5384. Formerly RCW 29.85.240.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.